lt-LT: Motociklo inkstų diržo paskirtis: Nuotykių / dvigubos paskirties; Bekelė / motokrosas; Lenktynės / trasa; Gatvė / važinėjimas mieste; Turistinis; Kita
ru: Назначение мотоциклетного поясничного пояса: Турэндуро / двойного назначения; Бездорожье / мотокросс; Гонки / трек; Стрит / поездки по городу; Туристический; Другое
fr: Usage de la ceinture lombaire de moto: Aventure / Double usage; Hors route / Motocross; Course / Circuit; Route / Trajets quotidiens; Touring; Autre
zh-CN: 摩托车护腰用途: 探险 / 全地形; 越野 / 越野摩托车; 赛车 / 赛道; 街道 / 通勤; 旅行; 其他
de: Zweck des Motorrad-Nierengurts: Adventure / Dual-Sport; Offroad / Motocross; Rennen / Strecke; Straße / Pendeln; Touring; Sonstige
tr: Motosiklet böbrek kemerinin amacı: Macera / çift amaçlı; Arazi / Motokros; Yarış / Pist; Sokak / Şehir içi; Touring; Diğer
bg-BG: Предназначение на мотоциклетния бъбречен колан: Приключенски / Двоен спорт; Офроуд / Мотокрос; Състезателни / Писта; Улични / Градско каране; Туринг; Друго
el: Σκοπός της ζώνης νεφρού μοτοσικλέτας: Adventure / Dual sport; Off-road / Motocross; Αγώνες / Πίστα; Δρόμος / Μετακίνηση; Touring; Άλλο
pt-PT: Finalidade do cinto de proteção lombar para motociclistas: Aventura/dual sport; Todo o terreno/motocross; Corridas/pista; Rua/deslocações diárias; Turismo; Outro
es: Uso de la faja lumbar para motocicleta: Aventura / Doble propósito; Todoterreno / Motocross; Carreras / Pista; Calle / Desplazamientos diarios; Turismo; Otro
sk-SK: Účel motocyklového bedrového pásu: Adventure / Enduro; Terén / Motokros; Preteky / Okruh; Cesta / Dochádzanie; Turistika; Iné
nb: Formålet med motorsykkelmagetaske: Adventure / dual sport; Terreng / motocross; Racing / bane; Gate / pendling; Touring; Annet
hu: Motoros derékvédő célja: Túra / Enduro (Dual sport); Terep / Motokrossz; Verseny / Pálya; Utcai / Ingázás; Túra; Egyéb
pt-BR: Cinta lombar para motocicleta finalidade: Aventura / uso misto; Off-road / Motocross; Corrida / pista; Rua / deslocamento urbano; Turismo; Outros
ko: 오토바이 허리 보호대 용도: 어드벤처/듀얼 스포츠; 오프로드/모터크로스; 레이싱/트랙; 스트리트/출퇴근용; 투어링; 기타
cs: Účel ledvinového pásu na motocykl: Adventure / dual sport; Off-road / motokros; Závodní / na okruh; Do města / na dojíždění; Touring; Jiné
hr-HR: Namjena pojasa za bubrege motocikla: Adventure / Dual-sport; Off-road / Motocross; Utrke / staza; Ulica / gradska vožnja; Touring; Ostalo
th: เข็มขัดพยุงหลังสำหรับมอเตอร์ไซค์ วัตถุประสงค์ของการใช้งาน: แอดเวนเจอร์/ดูอัลสปอร์ต; ออฟโรด/โมโตครอส; รถแข่ง/สนามแข่ง; สตรีท/ใช้งานในเมือง; ทัวร์ริ่ง; อื่นๆ
pl: Cel pasa nerkowego motocyklowego: Adventure / dual-sport; Terenowe / motocross; Wyścigi / tor; Ulice / dojazdy do pracy; Turystyka; Inne
sl-SI: Namen ledvičnega pasu za motorno kolo: Adventure / Dual sport; Terensko (Off-road) / Motokros; Dirke/dirkališče; Cesta/vsakodnevna vožnja; Touring; Drugo
zh-TW: 機車護腰帶用途: 探險 / 雙重運動; 越野 / 摩托車越野賽; 賽事 / 賽道; 街道 / 通勤; 巡迴旅行; 其他
da: Formålet med nyrebælte til motorcykler: Adventure/dual-sport; Offroad/motocross; Racer/bane; Gade/pendling; Touring; Andet
ja: オートバイ用キドニーベルトの目的: アドベンチャー / デュアルスポーツ; オフロード / モトクロス; レーシング / トラック; ストリート / 通勤; ツーリング; その他
it: Funzione della fascia lombare da moto: Adventure / Dual sport; Fuoristrada / Motocross; Racing / Pista; Strada / Uso quotidiano; Touring; Altro
vi: Mục đích của đai bảo vệ thận khi đi xe mô tô: Đa địa hình / Thể thao kép; Đường địa hình / Mô-tô địa hình; Đua xe / Đường đua; Đường phố / Đi lại hàng ngày; Đường trường; Khác
nl: Motor niergordel doel: Adventure / dual-sport; Offroad / motocross; Racing / circuit; Straat / woon-werkverkeer; Touring; Overig
sv: Syfte med njurbälte för motorcykel: Äventyr/dual-sport; Terräng/motocross; Tävling/bana; Gata/pendling; Touring; Övrigt
en: Motorcycle kidney belt purpose: Adventure / Dual sport; Off-road / Motocross; Racing / Track; Street / Commuting; Touring; Other
ro-RO: Scopul centurii lombare pentru motocicletă: Aventură / Dual sport; Off-road / Motocross; Curse / Pistă; Stradă / Navetă; Touring; Altele
fi: Moottoripyöräasun munuaisvyön tarkoitus: Seikkailu / dual-sport; Maasto / motocross; Kilpa-ajo / rata; Katu / työmatka; Matka-ajo; Muu